Tennessee, session 114, SB1674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-255(a)(2), is amended by
inserting the language ", ambulance station that has staff scheduled twenty-four (24) hours a
day," immediately after "a fire department that is staffed twenty-four (24) hours a day".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-255, is amended by deleting
"is staffed" wherever it appears in subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(5) and substituting "has
staff scheduled".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-255(a)(4)(C), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(C) Approved by and located inside a participating hospital, fire station,
ambulance station, police station, emergency communications center, or nursing home
that:
(i) Is licensed or otherwise legally operating in this state; and
(ii) Has staff scheduled continuously on a twenty-four-hour basis every
day by a licensed emergency medical services provider; and
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-255(h), is amended by
deleting the second sentence.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1674
010916
- 1 -